Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1828.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 41-1225, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-1225. Forfeiture of office of legislator A member of the legislature who is convicted of any felony in this article or sections 41-1282 or 41-1283, shall, in addition to the punishment prescribed, shall forfeit his the legislator's office and is forever disqualified from holding any office in this state. END_STATUTE